Hawaii statutes.
§281-15 Reports, accounts, audit. On
or before September 30 of each year the chairperson of the liquor
commission shall submit to the elected executive head of the county a full
report upon the business and operations of the commission during the preceding
year, which year shall be coterminous with the fiscal year of the county, with
such other matters of information and comment as the elected executive head may
deem appropriate. The elected executive head shall furnish copies thereof to
the legislative body of the county and to the fiscal officer of the county.

The accounts of the commissions for the several
counties shall be regularly examined by the fiscal officer who shall report
thereon in writing to the legislative body of the several counties. [L Sp 1933,
c 40, §7; RL 1935, §2576; RL 1945, §7227; RL 1955, §159-14; am L 1963, c 172,
§2(c); am L 1967, c 171, §1; HRS §281-15; gen ch 1993]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next